Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 5. REGULATION OF BUSINESSES AND SERVICES

SUBTITLE C. BUSINESS OPERATIONS

CHAPTER 119. COMMERCIAL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS

Sec. 119.0001. POSTING OF CERTAIN INFORMATION AT COMMERCIAL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION SITE REQUIRED. (a) In this section, "commercial" has the meaning assigned by Section 214.211, Local Government Code.

(b) As soon as practicable after beginning construction of a commercial building project located in this state, the developer of the project shall visibly post the following information at the entrance to the construction site:

(1) the name and contact information of the developer; and

(2) a brief description of the project.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 512 (S.B. 291), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Business and Commerce Code, Chapter 116 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(4), eff. September 1, 2023.